Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-7,114
Step-therapy override exception; process.

When coverage of a prescription drug for the treatment of any medical condition is restricted for use by a health carrier or utilization review organization through the use of a step-therapy protocol, the prescribing health care provider and the covered person shall have access to a clear, readily accessible, and convenient process to request a step-therapy override exception. A health carrier or utilization review organization may use its existing medical exceptions process to satisfy this requirement. The process used shall be easily accessible on the Internet site of the health carrier or utilization review organization.

Laws 2021, LB337, § 4.